Utah statutes.
11-25-4.   Location and character of rehabilitation -- Financial assistance.

An agency may determine the location and character of any residential rehabilitation to be financed under the provisions of this part and may lend financial assistance to any participating part for the purpose of financing residential rehabilitation in areas designated as residential rehabilitation areas by the agency.

